Utah statutes.
13-32a-113.   Secondhand Merchandise Operations Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Secondhand Merchandise Operations Restricted Account.

(2) (a)  The account shall be funded from the fees and administrative fines imposed and collected under Sections 13-32a-106, 13-32a-107, 13-32a-110, and 13-32a-111.  These fees and administrative fines shall be paid to the division, which shall deposit them in the account.

(b)  The Legislature shall appropriate the funds in this account:

(i)  to the board for the costs of providing training required under this chapter, costs of the central database created in Section 13-32a-105, and for costs of operation of the board; and

(ii)  to the division for management of fees and penalties paid under this chapter.

(c)  The board shall account to the division for expenditures.

(d)  The board shall account separately for expenditures for:

(i)  training required under this chapter;

(ii)  operation of the database; and

(iii)  operation of the board.

